Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-605.01
Governing official, defined.

Governing official shall mean the chief executive officer of a county, city, village or any other elected or appointed official, including a governing board member, who has any decisionmaking responsibility regarding the conduct of the lottery.

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 47.